Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-808.01
Abandoned and neglected pioneer cemeteries; access; when.

An owner of property upon which is located a pioneer cemetery affected by sections 12-807 to 12-810 shall not deny pedestrian access to such cemetery as prescribed by this section. Pedestrian access to a pioneer cemetery affected by sections 12-807 to 12-810 shall be granted on Memorial Day and from November 1 through March 1. When possible, visitors to such a pioneer cemetery shall notify the property owner of their presence prior to accessing the cemetery. The property owner may specify a pathway to the cemetery if such pathway is reasonable in direction and accessibility.

Laws 1996, LB 932, § 2.